Hawaii statutes.
§480-23.4 Penalty. Any witness granted
immunity under section 480-23(b) who fails or refuses to testify or produce
information may be punished by the court for contempt, provided that the
witness may also be charged with and convicted of perjury, for giving a false
statement, or for an offense involving a failure to comply with the order
notwithstanding the fact that the witness has been punished by the court for
contempt. [L 1980, c 173, §6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next